Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-413
Commercial fertilizer, defined.

For purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act, commercial fertilizer has the same meaning as in section 81-2,162.02.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 3.
December 31, 2029